Missouri, session 2026, HB2725.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 442.055, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 442.055, to read as follows:
442.055. 1. In the event that any premises currently rented, leased, or otherwise
legally occupied or any premises to be rented, leased, sold, transferred, or conveyed is or
was previously contaminated with radioactive material or other hazardous material, the
owner, seller, landlord, or other transferor shall disclose in writing to the current or
prospective lessee, purchaser, or transferee the fact the premises is or was previously
contaminated with radioactive material or other hazardous material; provided that, the owner,
seller, landlord, or other transferor has knowledge of such radioactive or other hazardous
contamination. In the event that an owner, seller, landlord, or other transferor does not make
the disclosure as required under this section, and the person had knowledge of such
radioactive or other hazardous contamination, the person shall be guilty of a class A
misdemeanor. As used in this section, the term "knowledge" shall require the receipt by the
owner, seller, landlord, or other transferor of [a report stating affirmatively] written or
electronic communication from a government agency that the premises is or was
previously contaminated with radioactive material or other hazardous material. If an owner,
seller, landlord, or other transferor had knowledge of current or previous contamination
with radioactive material or other hazardous material and failed to disclose such
contamination, the lessee may terminate the lease at no cost to the lessee.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2725 2
2. When a government agency requests from an owner, seller, landlord, or other
transferor a signed right of entry to test for radioactive material or other hazardous
material, the owner, seller, landlord, or other transferor shall disclose such request in
writing to any current or prospective lessee, purchaser, transferee, or other legal
occupant.
3. When a government agency acquires knowledge of radioactive or hazardous
material contamination on any residential property, such agency shall send written
notice to the current resident within thirty days.
✔